Montana, session 2025, SB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 44-7-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"44-7-201. Domestic violence intervention program. (1) The Montana board of crime control shall
use the money in the domestic violence intervention account established by 44-7-202 to fund a domestic
violence intervention program to provide grants to:
(a) communities for misdemeanor probation officers or compliance officers to monitor compliance
with sentencing court-ordered requirements for offenders convicted of or charged with the offense of partner or
family member assault under 45-5-206, the offense of strangulation of a partner or family member under 45-5-
215, or of a violation of an order of protection under 45-5-626; or
(b) a court to implement an offender intervention program that meets the standards adopted in 44-
7-210.
(2) In administering the domestic violence intervention program, the Montana board of crime
control shall:
(a) identify priorities for funding services, activities, and criteria for the receipt of program funds;
(b) monitor the expenditure of funds by organizations receiving funds under this section;
(c) evaluate the effectiveness of services and activities under this section; and
(d) adopt rules necessary to implement 44-7-201 through 44-7-204."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 280
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 280, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 280
INTRODUCED BY M. YAKAWICH
AN ACT REVISING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE INTERVENTION PROGRAM GRANT REQUIREMENTS;
ALLOWING THE MONTANA BOARD OF CRIME CONTROL TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO COMMUNITIES TO
MONITOR COMPLIANCE WITH COURT-ORDERED REQUIREMENTS FOR OFFENDERS CONVICTED OF
OR CHARGED WITH CERTAIN OFFENSES; AND AMENDING SECTION 44-7-201, MCA.